Wyoming, session 2025, HB0212.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 39-15-203(a)(i)(B), (C), (F)(intro),
(ii)(C), (iii)(A), (v)(B) and (C), 39-15-204(a)(intro),
39-16-203(a)(i)(B), (C), (F)(intro), (ii)(A), (iv)(B) and
(C) and 39-16-204(a)(intro) are amended to read:

HB0212

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0455
39-15-203. Imposition.

(a) Taxable event. The following shall apply:

(i) The following provisions apply to imposition
of the general purpose excise tax under W.S.
39-15-204(a)(i):

(B) The proposition to impose an excise tax
shall be at the expense of the county and be submitted to
the electors of the county upon the receipt by the board of
county commissioners of a petition requesting the election
signed by at least five percent (5%) of the electors of the
county or of a resolution approving the proposition from
the governing body of the county and the governing bodies
of at least fifty percent (50%) two-thirds (2/3) of the
incorporated municipalities within the county. If proposed
by petition by electors, the number of electors required
shall be determined by the number of votes cast at the last
general election. The election shall be at the direction
and under the supervision of the board of county
commissioners;

HB0212

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0455
(C) The proposition may be submitted at an
election held on a date authorized under W.S. 22-21-103. A
notice of election shall be given in at least one (1)
newspaper of general circulation published in the county in
which the election is to be held, and the notice shall
specify the object of the election. The notice shall be
published at least once each week for a thirty (30) day
period preceding the election. At the election the ballots
shall contain the words "for the county sales and use tax"
and "against the county sales and use tax". If a portion
of the proceeds from the tax will be used for economic
development as provided by W.S. 39-15-211(a)(i), the ballot
shall contain the words "a portion (or specific percentage)
of the tax proceeds shall be used for economic development"
in a clear and appropriate manner. If the proposition is
approved the same proposition shall be submitted at
subsequent general elections as provided in this
subparagraph until the proposition is defeated. If the tax
proposed is approved after July 1, 1989, the same
proposition shall be submitted at every other subsequent
general election until the proposition is defeated. However
in those counties where the tax is not in effect, the
county commissioners with the concurrence of the governing
HB0212

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0455
bodies of fifty percent (50%) two-thirds (2/3) of the
municipalities may establish the initial term of the tax at
four (4) two (2) years. If the term of the tax is limited
to two (2) years, the term of the tax shall be stated in
the proposition submitted to the voters. If a proposition
establishing the term of the tax at four (4) years is
approved, the proposition shall be submitted at the second
next general election and at every subsequent general
election following the election at which the proposition
was initially approved and at the general election held
every four (4) years thereafter until the proposition is
defeated;

(F) In lieu of the requirements of
subparagraph (C) of this paragraph providing for the
submission of the proposition at subsequent elections, the
tax authorized under W.S. 39-15-204(a)(i) may be continued
by an election or by a resolution as provided in this
subparagraph. For the tax to be continued by an election,
the county commissioners, with the concurrence of the
governing bodies of fifty percent (50%) of the
municipalities, shall submit a proposition to the voters
establishing the term of the tax as permanent. The
HB0212

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0455
proposition under this subparagraph shall be submitted in
the same manner as a proposition to impose the tax under
subparagraph (C) of this paragraph provided that the
proposition shall be submitted as a separate question at
the same election with a proposition to impose or continue
the tax under subparagraph (C) of this paragraph. The tax
may be continued by resolution, subject to the following
terms and conditions:

(ii) The following provisions apply to
imposition of the lodging excise tax under W.S.
39-15-204(a)(ii):

(C) The proposition to impose an excise tax
shall be at the expense of the county and be submitted to
the electors of the county upon the receipt by the board of
county commissioners of a petition requesting the election
signed by at least five percent (5%) of the electors of the
county or of a resolution approving the proposition from
the governing body of the county and the governing bodies
of at least fifty percent (50%) two-thirds (2/3) of the
incorporated municipalities within the county. If proposed
by petition by electors, the number of electors required
HB0212

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0455
shall be determined by the number of votes cast at the last
general election. The election shall be at the direction
and under the supervision of the board of county
commissioners;

(iii) The following provisions apply to
imposition of the specific purpose excise tax under W.S.
39-15-204(a)(iii):

(A) Before any proposition to impose the
tax or incur the debt shall be placed before the electors,
the governing body of a county and the governing bodies of
at least fifty percent (50%) two-thirds (2/3) of the
incorporated municipalities within the county shall adopt a
resolution approving the proposition, setting forth a
procedure for qualification of a ballot question for
placement on the ballot and specifying how excess funds
shall be expended;

(v) The following provisions apply to imposition
of the excise tax under W.S. 39-15-204(a)(vi) the purpose
of which is economic development:

HB0212

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0455
(B) The proposition to impose an excise tax
shall be at the expense of the county and be submitted to
the electors of the county upon the receipt by the board of
county commissioners of a petition requesting the election
signed by at least five percent (5%) of the electors of the
county or of a resolution approving the proposition from
the governing body of the county and the governing bodies
of at least fifty percent (50%) two-thirds (2/3) of the
incorporated municipalities within the county. If proposed
by petition by electors, the number of electors required
shall be determined by the number of votes cast at the last
general election. The election shall be at the direction
and under the supervision of the board of county
commissioners;

(C) The proposition may be submitted at an
election held on a date authorized under W.S. 22-21-103. A
notice of election shall be given in at least one (1)
newspaper of general circulation published in the county in
which the election is to be held, and the notice shall
specify the object of the election. The notice shall be
published at least once each week for a thirty (30) day
period preceding the election. At the election the ballots
HB0212

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0455
shall contain the words "for the county sales and use tax
for economic development" and "against the county sales and
use tax for economic development". If the tax proposed is
approved, the same proposition shall be submitted at every
other subsequent general election until the proposition is
defeated. However, the county commissioners with the
concurrence of the governing bodies of fifty percent (50%)
two-thirds (2/3) of the municipalities may establish the
initial term of the tax at four (4) two (2) years. If the
term of the tax is limited to two (2) years, the term of
the tax shall be stated in the proposition submitted to the
voters. If a proposition establishing the term of the tax
at four (4) years is approved, the proposition shall be
submitted at the second next general election and at every
subsequent general election following the election at which
the proposition was initially approved and at the general
election held every four (4) years thereafter until the
proposition is defeated;

39-15-204. Taxation rate.

(a) In addition to the state tax imposed under W.S.
39-15-101 through 39-15-111 any county of the state may
HB0212

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0455
impose the following excise taxes and any city or town may
impose the taxes tax authorized by paragraphs paragraph
(ii) and (vii) of this subsection and any resort district
may impose the tax authorized by paragraph (v) of this
subsection:

39-16-203. Imposition.

(a) Taxable event. The following shall apply:

(i) The following provisions apply to imposition
of the general purpose excise tax under W.S.
39-16-204(a)(i):

(B) The proposition to impose an excise tax
shall be at the expense of the county and be submitted to
the electors of the county upon the receipt by the board of
county commissioners of a petition requesting the election
signed by at least five percent (5%) of the electors of the
county or of a resolution approving the proposition from
the governing body of the county and the governing bodies
of at least fifty percent (50%) two-thirds (2/3) of the
incorporated municipalities within the county. If proposed
HB0212

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0455
by petition by electors, the number of electors required
shall be determined by the number of votes cast at the last
general election. The election shall be at the direction
and under the supervision of the board of county
commissioners;

(C) The proposition may be submitted at an
election held on a date authorized under W.S. 22-21-103. A
notice of election shall be given in at least one (1)
newspaper of general circulation published in the county in
which the election is to be held, and the notice shall
specify the object of the election. The notice shall be
published at least once each week for a thirty (30) day
period preceding the election. At the election the ballots
shall contain the words "for the county sales and use tax"
and "against the county sales and use tax". If a portion
of the proceeds from the tax will be used for economic
development as provided by W.S. 39-16-211(a)(i), the ballot
shall contain the words "a portion (or specific percentage)
of the proceeds will be used for economic development" in a
clear and appropriate manner. If the proposition is
approved the same proposition shall be submitted at
subsequent general elections as provided in this
HB0212

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0455
subparagraph until the proposition is defeated. If the tax
proposed is approved after July 1, 1989, the same
proposition shall be submitted at every other subsequent
general election until the proposition is defeated.
However in those counties where the tax is not in effect,
the county commissioners with the concurrence of the
governing bodies of fifty percent (50%) two-thirds (2/3) of
the municipalities may establish the initial term of the
tax at four (4) two (2) years. If the term of the tax is
limited to two (2) years, the term of the tax shall be
stated in the proposition submitted to the voters. If a
proposition establishing the term of the tax at four (4)
years is approved, the proposition shall be submitted at
the second next general election and at every subsequent
general election following the election at which the
proposition was initially approved and at the general
election held every four (4) years thereafter until the
proposition is defeated;

(F) In lieu of the requirements of
subparagraph (C) of this paragraph providing for the
submission of the proposition at subsequent elections, the
tax authorized under W.S. 39-16-204(a)(i) may be continued
HB0212

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0455
by an election or by a resolution as provided in this
subparagraph. For the tax to be continued by an election,
the county commissioners, with the concurrence of the
governing bodies of fifty percent (50%) of the
municipalities, shall submit a proposition to the voters
establishing the term of the tax as permanent. The
proposition under this subparagraph shall be submitted in
the same manner as a proposition to impose the tax under
subparagraph (C) of this paragraph provided that the
proposition shall be submitted as a separate question at
the same election with a proposition to impose or continue
the tax under subparagraph (C) of this paragraph. The tax
may be continued by resolution, subject to the following
terms and conditions:

(ii) The following provisions apply to
imposition of the specific purpose excise tax under W.S.
39-16-204(a)(ii):

(A) Before any proposition to impose the
tax or incur the debt shall be placed before the electors,
the governing body of a county and the governing bodies of
at least fifty percent (50%) two-thirds (2/3) of the
HB0212

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0455
incorporated municipalities within the county shall adopt a
resolution approving the proposition, setting forth a
procedure for qualification of a ballot question for
placement on the ballot and specifying how excess funds
shall be expended;

(iv) The following provisions apply to
imposition of the excise tax under W.S. 39-16-204(a)(v) the
purpose of which is economic development:

(B) The proposition to impose an excise tax
shall be at the expense of the county and be submitted to
the electors of the county upon the receipt by the board of
county commissioners of a petition requesting the election
signed by at least five percent (5%) of the electors of the
county or of a resolution approving the proposition from
the governing body of the county and the governing bodies
of at least fifty percent (50%) two-thirds (2/3) of the
incorporated municipalities within the county. If proposed
by petition by electors, the number of electors required
shall be determined by the number of votes cast at the last
general election. The election shall be at the direction
HB0212

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0455
and under the supervision of the board of county
commissioners;

(C) The proposition may be submitted at an
election held on a date authorized under W.S. 22-21-103. A
notice of election shall be given in at least one (1)
newspaper of general circulation published in the county in
which the election is to be held, and the notice shall
specify the object of the election. The notice shall be
published at least once each week for a thirty (30) day
period preceding the election. At the election the ballots
shall contain the words "for the county sales and use tax
for economic development" and "against the county sales and
use tax for economic development". If the tax proposed is
approved the same proposition shall be submitted at every
other subsequent general election until the proposition is
defeated. However, the county commissioners with the
concurrence of the governing bodies of fifty percent (50%)
two-thirds (2/3) of the municipalities may establish the
initial term of the tax at four (4) two (2) years. If the
term of the tax is limited to two (2) years, the term of
the tax shall be stated in the proposition submitted to the
voters. If a proposition establishing the term of the tax
HB0212

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0455
at four (4) years is approved, the proposition shall be
submitted at the second next general election and at every
subsequent general election following the election at which
the proposition was initially approved and at the general
election held every four (4) years thereafter until the
proposition is defeated;

39-16-204. Taxation rate.

(a) In addition to the state tax imposed under W.S.
39-16-101 through 39-16-111, any county of the state may
impose the following excise taxes, any city or town may
impose the tax authorized by paragraph (vi) of this
subsection and any resort district may impose the tax
authorized by paragraph (iv) of this subsection:

Section 2. W.S. 39-15-203(a)(vi), 39-15-204(a)(vii),
39-15-211(d), 39-16-203(a)(v), 39-16-204(a)(vi) and
39-16-211(d) are repealed.

Section 3.

HB0212

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0455
(a) Any municipal sales and use taxes that were
approved before the effective date of this act under W.S.
39-15-204(a)(vii) and 39-16-204(a)(vi), as repealed by
section 2 of this act, shall remain in effect until January
1, 2027.

(b) For municipalities that approved a sales and use
tax for a four (4) year period at the 2024 general
election, those municipalities shall vote on the sales and
use tax again at the 2028 general election and at every
general election thereafter in accordance with this act.

Section 4. This act is effective January 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0212